apertium-sv-da/dev/comb.da.dix
    <pardef n="sko__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gla/s__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sset</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ssene</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ko/p__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ppen</l>
          <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pper</l>
          <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pperne</l>
          <r>p<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oen</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øer</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øerne</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mode/m__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>m<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mmet</l>
          <r>m<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mmer</l>
          <r>m<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mmerne</l>
          <r>m<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dims__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ag/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eren</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rene</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/and__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>and</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anden</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænd</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ændene</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/ader__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aderen</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ader</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ædrene</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ædre</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="spiller__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/od__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oden</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ødder</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ødderne</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lag/en__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>net</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ner</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nerne</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="fader"><i>f</i><par n="f/ader__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fod"><i>f</i><par n="f/od__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lagen"><i>lag</i><par n="lag/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mand"><i>m</i><par n="m/and__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spiller"><i>spiller</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="treer"><i>treer</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arbejder"><i>arbejder</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="borger"><i>borger</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="computer"><i>computer</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dansker"><i>dansker</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ejer"><i>ejer</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forfatter"><i>forfatter</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="indbygger"><i>indbygger</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="japaner"><i>japaner</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kejser"><i>kejser</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kineser"><i>kineser</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="morder"><i>morder</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="musiker"><p><l>musikere</l><r>musiker</r></p><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="orkester"><i>orkester</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samlever"><i>samlever</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sanger"><i>sanger</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skuespiller"><i>skuespiller</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spanier"><i>spanier</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svensker"><i>svensker</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tigger"><p><l>tiggere</l><r>tigger</r></p><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ungarer"><i>ungarer</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ur"><p><l>ure</l><r>ur</r></p><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vejviser"><i>vejviser</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
